District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.15a

Health Professional Recruitment Fund.

(a)

There is established as a nonlapsing fund the Health Professional Recruitment Fund (“Fund”). All funds deposited into the Fund, and any interest earned on those funds, shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the sole purpose of providing loan repayments pursuant to the Program without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress.

(b)

The Mayor shall deposit in the Fund:

(1)

All general revenue funds appropriated by a line item in the budget submitted pursuant to § 1-204.46, and authorized by Congress for the purpose of the Program;

(2)

All fees and penalties generated pursuant to the Program; and

(3)

Any other funds received on behalf of the Fund for the purpose of the Program.

(c)

The Department of Health shall administer the Fund from its appropriated operating budget.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 16a
as added Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 5042, 53 DCR 6899
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5033(e), 55 DCR 7598
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 244(d), 56 DCR 1117

History

D.C. Law 17-219 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 17-353 redesignated the section amended by D.C. Law 17-219, § 5033(e) from § 7-751.16a to § 7-751.15a.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5042 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5042 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 5042 of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).

Emergency Legislation

Short Title

Short title: Section 5041 of D.C. Law 16-192 provided that subtitle D of title V of the act may be cited as the “Health Professional Recruitment Program Amendment Act of 2006”.

Short title: Section 5017 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle I of title V of the act may be cited as the “Reporting Requirements Act of 2008”.

For health professional recruitment program reporting requirements for Fiscal Year 2009, see subtitle I of title V of Law 17-219.

Editor's Notes